Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5982.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Findings.
The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:
(1) Consistent with § 42-5.1-1(l), proficiency in a second or multiple languages can be a
major tool for economic growth for our state and help overcome this country's disadvantage in the
world economy as we move into the twenty-first century.
(2) Consistent with § 42-5.1-1(j), the state both affirms the right of every resident to nurture
their native language and also encourages all citizens to become proficient in English to facilitate
full participation in society and promote cross-cultural communication.
(3) Consistent with § 42-5.1-1(j) and (k), native language instruction facilitates the
development of English proficiency with multilingual learners and boosts the overall academic
achievement of such children.
(4) Consistent with § 16-22-37, the department of education ("department"), in consultation
with local education agencies ("LEAs") that have a dual language program, was mandated to create
a model policy and timeline to assist LEAs in developing and implementing a dual language
program.
(5) The Rhode Island Blueprint for a Multilingual Learner Success (2021) calls for
expansion of opportunities for MLLs to access high-quality bilingual/bicultural programs while
developing literacies in multiple languages.
(6) There is overwhelming evidence that the state could expect a very high return to the

public by investing in high quality bilingual and dual language programming for all of our students.
(7) Dual language investments targeted towards program development for disadvantaged
children will help to promote both efficiency and educational equity for the children of our state.
(8) The expansion of funding for bilingual and dual language programs that advance
outcomes for multilingual learners is critical to achieving the state's goal for grade-level reading by
the third grade and other academic achievements.
SECTION 2. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 54.1
SUPPORT AND ACCESS TO BILINGUAL EDUCATION ACT
16-54.1-1. Short tile.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Support and Access to Bilingual
Education Act.
16-54.1-2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Dual language " or "DL" means a method of instruction that promotes a student's full
proficiency in all aspects of English and another language. DL programs educate students using
both English and a partner language for academic instruction and may divide the day by language
of instruction. Dual language programs may include: two (2)-way immersion programs that teach
multilingual learners alongside English-speakers who are learning a partner language; and one-way
immersion programs that serve a student population comprised of a predominant majority of
speakers of the same home language. This may include a student population with limited to no
proficiency in English (these one-way immersion programs are sometimes called developmental
bilingual) or a student population with limited to no proficiency in the partner language (these one-
way immersion programs are sometimes called world language immersion); and teachers pursuant
to these programs shall meet appropriate state certification requirements in accordance with the
department of education regulation 200-RICR-20-20-1.
(2) "Local education agency" or "LEA" shall have the same meaning as defined in 34 CFR
§ 303.23.
(3) "Qualifying languages" means the most common languages other than English spoken
in the state according to the U.S. Census Bureau, and other state data sources including, but not
limited to, the Algonquin Narragansett language.
16-54.1-3. SABE act fund authorized.
The department of elementary and secondary education (the "department") shall establish
LC001983 - Page 2 of 5

a dual language program fund within the department. For purposes of funding this chapter, the
general assembly shall appropriate the sum of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000).
(1) Subject to funding for the program, the department shall establish and maintain a dual
language ("DL") pilot program to provide grants to school districts and schools that establish DL
programs.
(2) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from money in the fund.
(3) The fund shall consist of:
(i) Appropriations made by the general assembly;
(ii) Charitable contributions to the fund subject to the provisions of § 38-2-2(4)(G); and
(iii) Other sources deemed appropriate by the department.
(b) Eligibility. Applicants shall be a certified local education agency (LEA) within the state
consistent with the provisions of 34 CFR § 303.2.
(c) An LEA may be eligible to receive a grant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if:
(1) The LEA uses a high-quality bilingual language instruction program model in
accordance with chapter 54 of title 16 and in accordance with regulations promulgated pursuant
thereto.
(2) The LEA has a multilingual learner student population exceeding fifteen percent (15%)
of the total pupil enrollment per RIDE data.
(i) The language(s) of instruction, in addition to English, shall be determined based on the
predominant home language(s) of the multilingual learner (MLL) student population.
(3) LEAs are encouraged to leverage existing funds including the state share of the MLL
funding formula distribution and federal funds.
16-54.1-4. Implementation of LEA dual language programs.
(a) LEA recipients of the SABE act fund per § 16-54.1-3, shall use funds for dual language
program planning and implementation activities including, but not limited to,
(1) Partnering with education professionals and organizations to design programs;
(2) Develop and execute professional development for administrators and instructional
staff;
(3) Procure high-quality curricular materials to enhance dual language instruction; and
(4) Other activities designed to facilitate or promote the LEA’s existing or emerging dual
language programs.
(b) Develop and commit to an immediate or gradual staffing plan to support the
kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) dual language program; or
(c) Only programs that adhere to high quality dual language program standards may be
LC001983 - Page 3 of 5

funded.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
========
LC001983
========
LC001983 - Page 4 of 5